Hawaii statutes.
§621-8 Attendance roll; parking violations
exemption. (a) The clerk of each circuit court shall keep an attendance
roll, in which shall be entered the name of each witness subpoenaed for the
prosecution in criminal cases in the circuit, the name of each witness
subpoenaed for the defendant at the expense of the State under order of the
court, where each witness was subpoenaed or summoned, the date of appearance,
the date of discharge, the number of days' attendance with the dates thereof,
the place of residence of the witness and the number of miles necessarily
traveled by the witness to the place of holding court. For all other witnesses
in civil and criminal cases, including cases in family court, the clerk of each
court shall keep an attendance roll in which shall be entered the name of each
witness subpoenaed or summoned, each date the witness appeared, and the date of
discharge.

(b) All witnesses summoned or subpoenaed to
appear in any circuit court, family court, or district court case, as well as
all court interpreters who appear at the request of the circuit court, family
court, or district court, shall be exempt from any prosecution, penalty, or
fine resulting from a parking violation for an expired meter committed in
connection with the witness or court interpreter appearing in court; provided
that the witness or court interpreter shall present any parking citation
received during this time to the clerk of the court and the clerk shall verify
that the witness or court interpreter was present at the time the citation was
received. The supreme court shall adopt rules necessary to effect this
section. [L 1907, c 53, §2; RL 1925, §2561; RL 1935, §3817; RL 1945, §9828; am
imp L 1945, c 35, §1; RL 1955, §222-8; HRS §621-8; am L 1972, c 104, §1(f); am
L 1988, c 281, §2; am L 1993, c 114, §1; am L 2011, c 42, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next